Massachusetts, session 194th, H3485.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6B of chapter 159B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “authority,” in line 4, the
following words:- or removed from a private way or property pursuant to section 120D of
chapter 266.
SECTION 2. Said section 6B of said chapter 159B, as so appearing, is hereby amended
by inserting the following after the word “way”, in line 17, the following words:- or pursuant to
removal from a private way or property.
SECTION 3. Section 39A of chapter 255 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the words “removed from the scene of an accident”, in lines 1 and 2,
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- involuntarily towed or transported pursuant
to section 6B of chapter 159B.
of 1